Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-721
Construction; operation; commission may regulate.

The commission may prohibit the construction of any line found to be in violation of the terms of section 75-709. After the hearing provided for in section 75-711, the commission shall make such order and prescribe such terms and conditions for the location, construction, and operation of the proposed line as it may deem just and reasonable. It may make such orders in the premises as in its judgment would best protect the rights of all parties interested and those of the general public. It is hereby made unlawful for any person, not specifically exempt, to begin or carry on the construction of any line designed to carry electric current for which application is required under section 75-710 or to increase the voltage of any existing line which would require such application without having first secured authority from the commission as set forth in section 75-710.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 21, p. 1428;

Laws 1980, LB 611, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 473;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 131.